New York, session 2025-2026, S10267.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 3463 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3463. Homeowners' liability insurance; available endorsement disclo- 4 sure. Every insurer offering a homeowners' insurance policy, as defined 5 in section two thousand three hundred fifty-one of this chapter, shall 6 disclose all available endorsements with plain language descriptions of 7 the coverage added by each endorsement as part of the application proc- 8 ess for such policy. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 10 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to all 11 contracts entered into, renewed, modified or amended on or after such 12 effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15549-01-6